California, session 20252026, AB539.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1371.8 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1371.8. (a) A health care service plan that authorizes a specific type of treatment by a provider shall not rescind or modify this authorization after the provider renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to the authorization for any reason, including, but not limited to, the plan’s subsequent rescission, cancellation, or modification of the enrollee’s or subscriber’s contract or the plan’s subsequent determination that it did not make an accurate determination of the enrollee’s or subscriber’s eligibility. This section shall not be construed to expand or alter the benefits available to the enrollee or subscriber under a plan. The Legislature finds and declares that by adopting the amendments made to this section by Assembly Bill 1324 of the 2007–08 Regular Session it does not intend to instruct a court as to whether or not the amendments are existing law.(b) A An approved prior authorization for a health care service requested by an in-network provider shall remain valid for the period required by the treating provider for the course of the prescribed treatment, not to exceed a period of at least one year from the date of approval, or throughout the course of prescribed treatment, if less than one year.(c) This section shall not be interpreted to permit a period of validity for a medication that is longer than a validity period established pursuant to state or federal law and regulation.(d) The one-year validity period established in subdivision (b) does not apply if the enrollee changes plans within the one year period.SEC. 2. Section 796.04 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:796.04. (a) A health insurer that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that authorizes a specific type of treatment for services covered under a policyholder’s contract or plan by a provider shall not rescind or modify this authorization after the provider renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to the authorization for any reason, including, but not limited to, the insurer’s subsequent rescission, cancellation, or modification of the insured’s or policyholder’s contract or the insurer’s subsequent determination that it did not make an accurate determination of the insured’s eligibility. This section shall not be construed to expand or alter the benefits available or the terms and conditions of the contract as may be agreed upon between a policyholder, certificate holder, or trust, and the insurer. The Legislature finds and declares that by adopting the amendments made to this section by Assembly Bill 1324 of the 2007–08 Regular Session it does not intend to instruct a court as to whether or not the amendments are existing law.(b) A An approved prior authorization for a health care service requested by an in-network provider shall remain valid for the period required by the treating provider for the course of the prescribed treatment, not to exceed a period of at least one year from the date of approval, or throughout the course of prescribed treatment, if less than one year.(c) This section shall not be interpreted to permit a period of validity for a medication that is longer than a validity period established pursuant to state or federal law and regulation.(d) The one-year validity period established in subdivision (b) does not apply if the insured changes insurers within the one year period.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.